Utah statutes.
73-5a-102.   Chapter does not apply to certain federal dams and reservoirs.

This chapter does not apply to works owned by the United States Bureau of Reclamation.  However, the Bureau of Reclamation shall file plans, drawings, and specifications of its works with the state engineer.



Amended by Chapter 264, 1996 General Session

